Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 7. Discharge and Transfers.

§ 37.2-837.
Discharge from state hospitals or training centers, conditional release, and trial or home visits for individuals.

Except for an individual receiving services in a state hospital who is held upon an order of a court for a criminal proceeding, the director of a state hospital or training center may discharge, after the preparation of a discharge plan:

Any individual in a state hospital who, in his judgment, (a) is recovered, (b) does not have a mental illness, or (c) is impaired or not recovered but whose discharge will not be detrimental to the public welfare or injurious to the individual;

Any individual in a state hospital who is not a proper case for treatment within the purview of this chapter; or

Any individual in a training center who chooses to be discharged or, if the individual lacks the mental capacity to choose, whose legally authorized representative chooses for him to be discharged. Pursuant to regulations of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services and the Department of Medical Assistance Services, no individual at a training center who is enrolled in Medicaid shall be discharged if the individual or his legally authorized representative on his behalf chooses to continue receiving services in a training center.For all individuals discharged, the discharge plan shall be formulated in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-505

by the community services board or behavioral health authority that serves the city or county where the individual resided prior to admission or by the board or authority that serves the city or county where the individual or his legally authorized representative on his behalf chooses to reside immediately following the discharge. The discharge plan shall be contained in a uniform discharge document developed by the Department and used by all state hospitals, training centers, and community services boards or behavioral health authorities, and shall identify (i) the services, including mental health, developmental, substance abuse, social, educational, medical, employment, housing, legal, advocacy, transportation, and other services that the individual will require upon discharge into the community and (ii) the public or private agencies that have agreed to provide these services. If the individual will be housed in an assisted living facility, as defined in §

63.2-100

, the discharge plan shall identify the facility, document its appropriateness for housing and capacity to care for the individual, contain evidence of the facility’s agreement to admit and care for the individual, and describe how the community services board or behavioral health authority will monitor the individual’s care in the facility. Prior to discharging an individual pursuant to subdivision A 1 or 2 who has not executed an advance directive, the director of a state hospital or his designee shall give to the individual a written explanation of the procedures for executing an advance directive in accordance with the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) and an advance directive form, which may be the form set forth in §

54.1-2984

.

The director may grant a trial or home visit to an individual receiving services in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. The state facility granting a trial or home visit to an individual shall not be liable for his expenses during the period of that visit. Such liability shall devolve upon the relative, conservator, person to whose care the individual is entrusted while on the trial or home visit, or the appropriate local department of social services of the county or city in which the individual resided at the time of admission pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board of Social Services.

Any individual who is discharged pursuant to subdivision A 2 shall, if necessary for his welfare, be received and cared for by the appropriate local department of social services. The provision of public assistance or social services to the individual shall be the responsibility of the appropriate local department of social services as determined by regulations adopted by the State Board of Social Services. Expenses incurred for the provision of public assistance to the individual who is receiving 24-hour care while in an assisted living facility licensed pursuant to Chapters 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) and 18 (§

63.2-1800

et seq.) of Title 63.2 shall be the responsibility of the appropriate local department of social services of the county or city in which the individual resided at the time of admission.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-94; 1950, p. 912; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-98; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1977, c. 189; 1980, c. 582; 1985, c. 87; 1986, cc. 256, 309; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1998, c. 680; 2002, cc. 62, 557, 747; 2005, c. 716; 2008, c. 263; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2016, c. 688.

Cross references.

As to social services and public assistance provided to patients discharged from state hospitals and training centers by local social services boards, see §

63.2-1602

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993, which amended this section, provide in cl. 4: “That the provisions of this act shall be implemented to the extent funds are appropriated therefor.” See Acts 1993, c. 994, item 381 B, which relates to the extent funds have been appropriated for Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 263 inserted “and shall identify” and clauses (i) and (ii) to the second sentence in the last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “Except for an individual receiving services in a state hospital who is” for “Except for a state hospital consumer” at the beginning of subsection A; substituted “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section; substituted “mental health, developmental, substance abuse” for “mental health, mental retardation, substance abuse” in clause (i), and “individual’s” for “consumer’s” near the end of the concluding paragraph of subsection A; and substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer” in the first sentence, and “an individual” for “a consumer” in the second sentence of subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 688, in subdivision 3, added “Prior to discharging an individual pursuant to subdivision A 1 or 2 who has not executed an advance directive, the director of a state hospital or his designee shall give to the individual a written explanation of the procedures for executing an advance directive in accordance with the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2984

et seq.) and an advance directive form, which may be the form set forth in §

54.1-2984

.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, §§ 5, 8.

§ 37.2-838.
Discharge of individuals from a licensed hospital.

The person in charge of a licensed hospital may discharge any individual involuntarily admitted who is recovered or, if not recovered, whose discharge will not be detrimental to the public welfare or injurious to the individual, or who meets other criteria as specified in §

37.2-837

. Prior to discharging any individual who has not executed an advance directive, the person in charge of a licensed hospital or his designee shall give to the individual a written explanation of the procedures for executing an advance directive in accordance with the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) and an advance directive form, which may be the form set forth in §

54.1-2984

. The person in charge of the licensed hospital may refuse to discharge any individual involuntarily admitted, if, in his judgment, the discharge will be detrimental to the public welfare or injurious to the individual. The person in charge of a licensed hospital may grant a trial or home visit to an individual in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-99; 1976, c. 671; 1980, cc. 582, 583; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2016, c. 688.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section, and “an individual” for “a consumer” in the third sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 688 added the second sentence.

§ 37.2-839.
Exchange of information between community services boards or behavioral health authorities and state facilities.

Community services boards or behavioral health authorities and state facilities may, when the individual has refused authorization, exchange the information required to prepare and implement a comprehensive individualized treatment plan, including a discharge plan as specified in subsection A of §

37.2-837

. This section shall apply to all
individuals receiving services from community services boards, behavioral health authorities, and state facilities.

When an individual who is deemed suitable for discharge pursuant to subsection A of §

37.2-837

or his guardian or conservator refuses to authorize the release of information that is required to formulate and implement a discharge plan as specified in subsection A of §

37.2-837

, then the community services board or behavioral health authority may release without authorization to those service providers and human service agencies identified in the discharge plan only the information needed to secure those services specified in the plan.

The release of any other information about an individual receiving services to any agency or person not affiliated directly or by contract with community services boards, behavioral health authorities, or state facilities shall be subject to all regulations adopted by the Board or by agencies of the United States government that govern confidentiality of patient information.

History.

1985, c. 87, § 37.1-98.2; 1999, c. 764; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services from” for “consumers of” in the second sentence of the first paragraph, “When an individual” for “When a consumer” at the beginning of the second paragraph, and “information about an individual receiving services to any agency or person” for “consumer information to any agency or individual” near the beginning of the third paragraph.

§ 37.2-840.
Transfer of individuals receiving services.

The Commissioner may order the transfer of an individual receiving services from one state hospital to another or from one training center to another. When so transferred, in accordance with appropriate admission, certification, or involuntary admission criteria as provided in this chapter, the individual is hereby declared to be lawfully admitted to the state facility to which he is transferred.

If the guardian, conservator, or relative of an individual receiving services in a licensed hospital refuses or is otherwise unable to provide properly for his care and treatment, the person in charge of the licensed hospital may:

Apply to the Commissioner for the transfer of the individual to a state hospital, or

Apply to the Director of the United States Veterans Affairs Medical Center for the transfer of the individual to the center.Upon the transfer, the state hospital or Veterans Affairs Medical Center may admit the individual under the authority of the admission or order applicable to the licensed hospital from which the individual was transferred. The transfer shall not alter any right of an individual under the provisions of Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2 nor shall the transfer divest a judge or special justice before whom a hearing or request therefor is pending of jurisdiction to conduct a hearing. Prior to accepting the transfer of any individual from a licensed hospital, the Commissioner shall receive from that hospital a report that indicates that the individual is in need of further hospitalization. Upon admission of an individual to a state hospital pursuant to this section, the director of the state hospital shall notify the community services board or behavioral health authority that serves the city or county where the admitted individual resides of the individual’s name and local address and of the location of the state hospital to which the individual has been admitted, provided that the individual or his guardian has authorized the release of the information.

Whenever an individual is admitted by a state hospital or training center, the Commissioner, upon a recommendation by the community services board or behavioral health authority serving the individual’s county or city of residence prior to his admission to the hospital or training center, may order the transfer of the individual to any other hospital, training center, or Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation. Such other hospital, training center, or Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation may admit the individual under the authority of the admission or order applicable to the hospital or training center from which the individual was transferred. The transfer shall not alter any right of the individual under the provisions of this chapter nor shall the transfer divest a judge or special justice before whom a hearing or request therefor is pending of jurisdiction to conduct such hearing.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-7, 37-126.1; 1950, pp. 900, 918; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-48, 37.1-86, 37.1-99; 1970, c. 673, § 37.1-78.1; 1976, c. 671; 1980, cc. 582, 583; 1984, c. 174; 1986, c. 349; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer” in subsection A and in the introductory paragraph of subsection B; substituted “the individual” for “a consumer” in subsection A; and substituted “individual” for “consumer,” “an individual” for “a consumer,” “an individual” for “a person,” “individual” for “person,” “individual’s” for “person’s” throughout subsections B and C.

§ 37.2-841.
Admission of veteran to, or transfer to or from, a Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation.

Whenever it appears that a person with mental illness is a veteran eligible for treatment in a Veterans’ Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation, the district court judge or special justice may, upon receipt of a certificate of eligibility from that hospital, center, or other facility or installation, order the person to that hospital, center, or other facility or installation, regardless of whether the person resides in Virginia. Any veteran who has been or is in a state hospital and is eligible for treatment in a Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation may be transferred to a Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation with the written consent of its manager. Any veteran admitted to a Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation, if he resided in Virginia prior to his admission and meets the criteria for admission to a state hospital, may be transferred to a state hospital with the written authorization of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-73; 1950, p. 905; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-93; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-842.
Veterans admitted or transferred to Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation subject to rules; power and authority of medical officer in charge.

Every veteran, after admission to a Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation, either upon initial admission or transfer, shall be subject to the regulations of the Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation, and the medical officer in charge of the Veterans Affairs hospital, center, or other facility or installation to which the veteran is admitted or transferred is vested with the same powers authorized by law to be exercised by the director of a state hospital with reference to retention, custody, trial or home visit, and discharge of the veteran so admitted or transferred.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-74; 1950, p. 905; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-94; 1972, c. 639; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-843.
Providing drugs or medicines for certain individuals discharged from state facilities.

When any individual is discharged from a state facility and he or the person liable for his care and treatment is financially unable to pay for or otherwise access drugs or medicines that are prescribed for him by a member of the medical staff of the state facility in order to mitigate or prevent a recurrence of the condition for which he has received care and treatment in the state facility, the Department or the community services board or behavioral health authority serving the individual’s county or city of residence may, from funds appropriated to the Department for that purpose, provide the individual with such drugs and medicines, which shall be dispensed only in accordance with law.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-92.1; 1958, c. 158; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-101; 1986, c. 349; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual” for “consumer” twice, and “individual’s” for “consumer’s.”